District of Columbia, session 26, B26-0048.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE COUNCIL OF THE DISTRICT OF COLUMBIA, That this
act may be cited as the “Review of Agency Action Clarification Amendment Act of 2025”.
Sec. 2. Section 110 of the District of Columbia Administrative Procedure Act, approved
October 21, 1968 (82 Stat. 1209; D.C. Official Code § 2-510), is amended as follows:
(a) Subsection (a)(1) is amended by striking the phrase “So far as necessary” and
inserting the phrase “Subject to subsections (c), (d), and (e) of this section and so far as
necessary” in its place.
(b) New subsections (c), (d), and (e) are added to read as follows:
“(c) In reviewing an order or decision of an agency in any court or administrative
proceeding, including proceedings under subsection (a) of this section, the reviewing tribunal
shall defer to the agency’s reasonable interpretation of a statute or rule it administers, when the
statute or rule is silent or ambiguous with respect to a specific issue; provided, that the
interpretation is not plainly wrong or inconsistent with either the statute’s or rule’s language or
the legislature’s or agency’s intent.
“(d) In reviewing a rule adopted by an agency, the reviewing tribunal shall defer to the
agency’s reasonable interpretation of a statute it administers, when the statute is silent or
ambiguous with respect to a specific issue; provided, that the interpretation is not plainly wrong
or inconsistent with either the statute’s language or the legislature’s intent.
“(e) In determining whether an interpretation by an agency is reasonable under subsection
(c) or (d) of this section, the reviewing tribunal may consider, among other factors:
1

ENROLLED ORIGINAL
“(1) Whether the interpretation provided by an agency has been consistent and
longstanding;
“(2) Whether the specific issue is within the scope of the agency’s subject matter-
expertise; and
“(3) The thoroughness and formality of the agency’s consideration.”.
Sec. 3. Fiscal impact statement.
The Council adopts the fiscal impact statement in the committee report as the fiscal
impact statement required by section 4a of the General Legislative Procedures Act of 1975,
approved October 16, 2006 (120 Stat. 2038; D.C. Official Code § 1-301.47a).
Sec. 4. Effective date.
This act shall take effect following approval by the Mayor (or in the event of veto by the
Mayor, action by the Council to override the veto) and a 30-day period of congressional review
as provided in section 602(c)(1) of the District of Columbia Home Rule Act, approved December
24, 1973 (87 Stat. 813; D.C. Official Code § 1-206.02(c)(1)).
___________________________________
Chairman
Council of the District of Columbia
_________________________________
Mayor
District of Columbia
2